Hawaii statutes.
§200-3 Ocean recreation and coastal areas
programs. The board shall assume the following functions of the department
of transportation:

(1) Managing and administering the ocean-based
recreation and coastal areas programs of the State;

(2) Planning, developing, operating, administering,
and maintaining small boat harbors, launching ramps, and other boating
facilities and associated aids to navigation throughout the State;

(3) Developing and administering an ocean recreation
management plan;

(4) Administering and operating a vessel registration
system for the State;

(5) Regulating the commercial use of state waters and
marine resources, including operations originating from private marinas;

(6) Regulating boat regattas and other ocean water
events;

(7) Administering a marine casualty and investigation
program;

(8) Assisting in abating air, water, and noise
pollution;

(9) Conducting public education in boating safety;

(10) Administering the boating special fund;

(11) Assisting in controlling shoreline erosion;

(12) Repairing seawalls and other existing coastal
protective structures under the jurisdiction of the State; and

(13) Removing nonnatural obstructions and public
safety hazards from the shoreline, navigable streams, harbors, channels, and coastal
areas of the State. [L 1991, c 272, pt of §2; am L 2012, c 289, §2]

Law Journals and Reviews

Wiping Out the Ban on Surfboards at Point Panic. 27 UH L.
Rev. 303.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next